Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.473

Medical use of cannabis-infused products—Suspension of policies that authorize student use on school grounds.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction and school districts must suspend implementation of RCW 28A.210.325 and 69.51A.225 if:

(a) The federal government issues a communication after July 28, 2019, that suggests that federal education funding will be withheld if the state continues to implement RCW 28A.210.325 and 69.51A.225;

(b) The superintendent of public instruction requests a formal opinion by the state attorney general on the federal communication; and

(c) The state attorney general provides a formal opinion that the federal communication has reasonably demonstrated that continued implementation of RCW 28A.210.325 and 69.51A.225 reasonably jeopardizes future federal funding.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must provide the state attorney general opinion to the education and fiscal committees of the legislature within thirty days of the issuance of the opinion.

[ 2019 c 204 s 4.]